Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1473
Unconscionability.

(1) If a court, as a matter of law, finds that a rental agreement or any provision of a rental agreement was unconscionable when made, the court may refuse to enforce the agreement, enforce the remainder of the agreement without the unconscionable provision, or limit the application of any unconscionable provision to avoid an unconscionable result.

(2) If a court, as a matter of law, finds that a settlement in which a party waives or agrees to forego a claim or right under the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act or under a rental agreement was unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the settlement, enforce the remainder of the settlement without the unconscionable provision, or limit the application of any unconscionable provision to avoid any unconscionable result.

(3) If unconscionability is put into issue by a party or by a court upon its own motion, the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to the setting, purpose, and effect of the rental agreement or settlement to aid the court in making the determination.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 24.